Hawaii statutes.
§329-33 Registration. (a) The
department of public safety shall register an applicant to manufacture,
dispense, prescribe, distribute, or conduct reverse distribution with
controlled substances included in sections 329-14, 329-16, 329-18, 329-20, and
329-22 unless it determines that the issuance of that registration would be
inconsistent with the public interest. In determining the public interest, the
department of public safety shall consider the following factors:

(1) Maintenance of effective controls against
diversion of controlled substances into other than legitimate medical,
scientific, or industrial channels;

(2) Compliance with applicable state and local law;

(3) Any convictions of the applicant under any
federal and state laws relating to any controlled substance;

(4) Past experience in the manufacture or
distribution of controlled substances, and the existence in the applicant's
establishment of effective controls against diversion;

(5) Furnishing by the applicant of false or
fraudulent material in any application filed under this chapter;

(6) Suspension, revocation, or surrender of the
applicant's federal registration to manufacture, distribute, prescribe, or
dispense controlled substances as authorized by federal law; and

(7) Any other factor relevant to and consistent with
the public health and safety.

(b) Registration under subsection (a) does not
entitle a registrant to manufacture, dispense, prescribe, and distribute
controlled substances in schedule I or II other than those specified in the
registration.

(c) Practitioners shall be registered to
dispense or to prescribe any controlled substances or to conduct research with
controlled substances in schedules II through V if they are authorized to
dispense or to prescribe or conduct research under the law of this State. The
department of public safety need not require separate registration under this
part for practitioners engaging in research with nonnarcotic controlled
substances in schedules II through V where the registrant is already registered
under this part in another capacity. Practitioners registered under federal
law to conduct research with schedule I substances may conduct research with
schedule I substances within this State upon furnishing the department of
public safety evidence of that federal registration.

(d) Compliance by manufacturers and
distributors with the provisions of the federal law respecting registration
(excluding fees) entitles them to be registered under this chapter. [L 1972, c
10, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 281, §10; am L 2009, c 117, §4; am L 2016, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next